Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.154

Capital projects advisory review board—Review—Recommendations.

Beginning in 2025 and every five years thereafter, the capital projects advisory review board must review construction cost escalation data for Washington state, readily available in industry publications, roster utilization, and other appropriate data and metrics, and make recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature on adjustments to the contracting thresholds described in RCW 39.04.152.

[ 2023 c 395 s 16.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 395 ss 1-30, 32-34, 36, and 37: See note following RCW 39.04.010.

Findings—Intent—2023 c 395: See note following RCW 39.04.010.